Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-1703
Insurance sold with credit transaction; applicability of law; exceptions.

All life insurance and all accident and health insurance sold in connection with loans or other credit transactions shall be subject to sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 except such insurance sold in connection with a loan or other credit transaction of more than ten years duration or fifteen years duration when made by licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. No insurance shall be subject to sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 when the issuance of such insurance is an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer and not related to an agreement or a plan for insuring debtors of the creditor.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 3, p. 738;

Laws 1969, c. 377, § 1, p. 1338;

Laws 1987, LB 306, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 555, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 27;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 51.

Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, see section 45-334.